Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.642.020

Rules and guidelines.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules and guidelines to eliminate discrimination prohibited in RCW 28A.642.010 and 28A.320.233 as it applies to public school employment, counseling and guidance services to students, recreational and athletic activities for students, access to course offerings, and in textbooks, instructional materials, and supplemental instructional materials, and student access to those materials.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "supplemental instructional materials" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.320.235.

[ 2024 c 316 s 5; 2010 c 240 s 3.]